Maine, session 132, LD113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA c. 101, sub-c. 8 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 8
LABELING FOODS FOR MESSENGER RIBONUCLEIC ACID VACCINE
MATERIAL
§530-F. Labels for food or food products that include messenger ribonucleic acid
vaccine material
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Aquaculture" has the same meaning as in Title 12, section 6001, subsection 1.
B. "Food or food products" has the same meaning as in section 282, subsection 2.
C. "Livestock" has the same meaning as in section 81, subsection 8.
D. "Messenger ribonucleic acid vaccine material" or "mRNA vaccine material" means
a substance included in a vaccine to stimulate the production of antibodies and provide
immunity against disease by introducing messenger ribonucleic acid that corresponds
to a viral protein.
E. "Poultry" has the same meaning as in section 1751, subsection 5.
2. Labeling required. A label must be placed on a food or food product offered for
sale in the State derived from aquaculture, livestock or poultry that received mRNA vaccine
material. The label must:
A. Contain a clear and concise statement that the food or food product contains mRNA
vaccine material; and
B. Be conspicuously and prominently placed in order to be easily seen by the consumer.
3. Enforcement; rules. If inspection personnel of the department find that the food or
food product is not properly labeled as required by this section, the commissioner shall
issue a stop order for the food or food product until it is labeled in accordance with this
section.
The department shall adopt rules implementing this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this
subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.